Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III. GENERAL PROVISIONS]

§290-41 Notice to police department.
Before a vehicle is towed by any business engaged in towing vehicles, the owner
of the towing business or the owner's designated representative shall notify
the police department of the county by telephone to determine if the police
department of the county has any investigative interest in that vehicle,
describing the vehicle, the place from which it is to be towed, and such other
information as the police department requires to be furnished. If the vehicle
is towed and not claimed within forty-eight hours from the time the vehicle is
towed, a written notification, containing the same information, shall
immediately be sent to the police department by the owner of the business or
the owner's designated representative. [L 1971, c 119, §2; am L 1982, c 36, §1;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next